New Mexico, session 2026, HB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three hundred seventy thousand dollars ($370,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to ensure full reimbursement for health care providers who provide vagus nerve stimulation to medicaid recipients. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233491.1